Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1789.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law not to be


codified in the Oklahoma Statutes reads as follows:


The Legislature finds that:



Req. No. 3464 Page 1


1. Timely teacher licensure is essential to ensuring that


public school districts are able to staff classrooms effectively and


provide uninterrupted instruction to students;


2. Administrative delay in the teacher licensure process can


contribute to teacher shortages, particularly in rural and high-need


school districts, and undermine local efforts to recruit qualified


educators;


3. School district boards of education are often best


positioned to evaluate the qualifications, character, and readiness


of teacher candidates to meet the instructional needs of their


communities;


4. Excessive centralization of teacher licensure decisions can


create unnecessary barriers to employment and delay the placement of


otherwise qualified teachers in classrooms in this state; and


5. Clear timelines and accountability in the teacher licensure


process promote efficiency, transparency, and responsiveness while


preserving statutory standards and state-level oversight.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5-117.8 of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Local


Teacher Licensure Act”. The purpose of the Local Teacher Licensure


Act shall be to grant school district boards of education the


authority to evaluate and recommend teacher licensure or

Req. No. 3464 Page 2


certification applications. The State Board of Education shall


maintain final oversight and ratification authority over the


issuance of teacher licenses or certificates in compliance with


Section 5 of Article XIII of the Oklahoma Constitution and Section


3-104 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


B. School district boards of education are hereby authorized to


evaluate and recommend approval of teacher licensure or


certification applications to the State Board of Education based on


the standards set forth in Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.


C. Upon receiving a recommendation for licensure or


certification from a school district board of education, the State


Board of Education shall:


1. Review the recommendation for completeness and compliance


with statutory requirements including, but not limited to, Sections


5-142, 6-107, 6-122.3, 6-187, and 6-190 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. A recommendation shall be considered complete when the


Board has received all documentation showing compliance with the


statutory provisions in place for teacher licensure or certification


when the recommendation was submitted;


2. Approve or reject the licensure or certification


recommendations within thirty (30) calendar days of receipt; and


3. Provide written notification of approval or rejection to the


recommending school district board of education and the licensure or


certification applicant.

Req. No. 3464 Page 3


D. Failure of the State Board of Education to act on a


recommendation within thirty (30) calendar days pursuant to


subsection C of this section shall result in the Board’s automatic


approval of the license or certificate; provided, however, that the


recommendation submitted by the school district board of education


meets all statutory and procedural requirements for teacher


licensure or certification set forth in Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes and the rules promulgated by the Board.


E. Teacher licenses or certificates issued pursuant to the


provisions of this section shall be valid for a term of five (5)


years from the date of issuance and shall be subject to renewal in


accordance with the provisions of Section 6-108.1 of Title 70 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


F. The State Board of Education shall retain oversight of all


teacher licensure or certification processes, and the State


Department of Education shall maintain all records regarding teacher


licenses or certificates issued pursuant to this section.


G. School district boards of education shall establish


transparent procedures for licensure or certification


recommendations including:


1. Timelines for application submission, which shall provide


teacher license or certificate applicants with a minimum of twenty


(20) calendar days to complete the process;



Req. No. 3464 Page 4


2. A timeline for board of education review and approval or


rejection, not to exceed thirty (30) calendar days from the date of


application submission; and


3. Written notification to the teacher license or certificate


applicant and the State Department of Education within five (5)


business days of the board of education’s decision.


H. Neither a school district nor its board of education shall


be liable for civil damages arising solely from a recommendation


submitted pursuant to the provisions of this section.


I. The State Board of Education may promulgate rules strictly


necessary to implement the provisions of this section.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 4. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3464 EB 1/14/2026 6:46:29 PM













Req. No. 3464 Page 5